Maine, session 132, LD1477.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 38 MRSA §87-A, sub-§1, ¶E, as amended by PL 2011, c. 14, §2, is further
amended to read:
E. All military ships navigating the Kennebec River to and from the Bath Iron Works
Corporation for the purpose of accomplishing overhaul, repair, post shakedown
availability and sea trials; and
Sec. 2. 38 MRSA §87-A, sub-§1, ¶F, as amended by PL 2015, c. 14, §1, is further
amended to read:
F. Noncommercial foreign vessels with overall length of under 253 feet.; and
Sec. 3. 38 MRSA §87-A, sub-§1, ¶G is enacted to read:
G. An American-flagged vessel with an American crew on regularly scheduled ferry
operations between Bar Harbor, Maine and Yarmouth, Nova Scotia, Canada, as long
as:
(1) The master of the vessel has the following qualifications:
(a) A United States Coast Guard unlimited master's license; and
(b) A United States Coast Guard first class pilotage endorsement for the area
of operation; and
(2) The vessel takes a pilot licensed under this subchapter on one round trip per
calendar week.